Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
Article 5 Regulation by Department

Editor’s notes.

This article was designated by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462, effective June 30, 2020.

7-3-40.
Investigations and examinations; payment of fees; cooperation by licensee.

The department is authorized to investigate and examine the affairs, businesses, premises, and records of any applicant, licensee, or any other installment lender as often as it deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, regardless of whether such applicant, licensee, or other installment lender acts or claims to act under any other licensing or registration requirement of this state. The department may conduct such investigation outside of this state if it deems necessary.

The department may conduct an investigation or examination pursuant to this Code section at least once every 60 months; provided, however, that the department may alter the frequency or scope of investigations or examinations through rules and regulations or waive an investigation or examination if it determines that, based on records submitted to the department and the past history of operations in this state, such investigation or examination is unnecessary.

A licensee or other installment lender shall pay a fee as prescribed by rule or regulation of the department to cover the cost of an investigation or examination.

In carrying out an investigation or examination pursuant to this Code section, the department shall be authorized to:

Conduct an on-site examination of any applicant, licensee, or other installment lender at any location without prior notice;

Access, receive, and use any books, accounts, records, files, documents, evidence, or other information, including, but not limited to:

Criminal, civil, and administrative history information, including information related to charges that did not result in a conviction;

Personal history and experience information, including, but not limited to, independent credit reports obtained from a consumer reporting agency described in the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 1681a; and

Any other documents, information, or evidence the department deems relevant to the investigation or examination, regardless of the location, possession, control, or custody of such documents, information, or evidence;

Enter into agreements or relationships with other government officials or regulatory authorities to improve efficiencies and reduce regulatory burden by sharing resources, documents, records, information, or evidence or by utilizing standardized or uniform methods or procedures;

Accept and rely on investigation or examination reports made by other government officials or regulatory authorities within or outside this state, provided that such reports provide information necessary to fulfill the responsibilities of the department under this chapter;

Accept and incorporate in any report of the department audit reports or portions of audit reports made by an independent certified public accountant on behalf of an applicant or licensee;

Require or permit any person to file a statement in writing as to all the facts and circumstances concerning any matter to be investigated pursuant to this chapter;

Request any financial data relevant to the business of making installment loans;

Administer oaths, call any party to testify under oath, and require the attendance of witnesses;

Require the production of books, accounts, records, files, documents, and papers;

Take the depositions of witnesses; and

Issue subpoenas for any witness or for the production of documentary evidence.

Each licensee or person subject to this chapter shall make available to the department, upon request, any books, accounts, records, files, documents, evidence, or other information relating to the activities of engaging in the business of making installment loans.

No licensee or person subject to investigation or examination under this chapter shall knowingly withhold, abstract, remove, mutilate, destroy, or secrete any books, accounts, records, files, documents, evidence, or other information.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-3-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective June 30, 2020. See Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter for applicability.

7-3-41.
Subpoena powers and procedures.

A subpoena issued pursuant to Code Section 7-3-40 may be served by:

Registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested, to the addressee’s business or personal mailing address;

Examiners appointed by the department; or

The sheriff of the county where such witness resides or is found or where the person in custody of any books, accounts, records, files, documents, or papers resides or is found.

The department may issue and apply to enforce subpoenas in this state at the request of any governmental agency, department, organization, or entity regulating the making of installment loans in another state if the activities constituting the alleged violation for which the information is sought would be a violation of this chapter if the alleged activities had occurred in this state.

If any person refuses to obey a subpoena issued under this chapter, a superior court of appropriate jurisdiction, upon application by the department, may issue to the person an order requiring such person to appear before the court to show cause why such person should not be held in contempt for refusal to obey the subpoena. Failure to obey a subpoena may be punished as contempt by the court.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-3-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective June 30, 2020. See Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter for applicability.

7-3-42.
Impact of felony convictions of licensee; criminal background checks.

The department shall not issue a license and may revoke a license if it finds that the applicant or licensee or any director, trustee, agent, owner, executive officer, or covered employee of the applicant or licensee has been convicted of a felony in any jurisdiction or of a crime which, if committed within this state, would constitute a felony under the laws of this state. For the purposes of this article, a person shall be deemed to have been convicted of a crime if such person shall have pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to a charge thereof before a court or federal magistrate or shall have been found guilty thereof by the decision or judgment of a court or federal magistrate or by the verdict of a jury, irrespective of the pronouncement of sentence or the suspension thereof and regardless of whether first offender treatment without adjudication of guilt pursuant to the charge was entered or an adjudication or sentence was otherwise withheld or not entered on that charge, unless and until such plea of guilty or nolo contendere or such decision, judgment, or verdict shall have been set aside, reversed, or otherwise abrogated by lawful judicial process or until probation, sentence, or both probation and sentence of a first offender without adjudication of guilt have been successfully completed and documented or unless the person convicted of the crime shall have received a pardon therefor from the President of the United States or the governor or other pardoning authority in the jurisdiction where the conviction occurred.

The department shall be authorized to obtain criminal history record checks with respect to any applicant or licensee, any owner of the applicant or licensee, and any individual who is a director, trustee, executive officer, agent, or covered employee of the applicant or licensee. Such criminal history record checks may be requested by the department through the Georgia Crime Information Center and the Federal Bureau of Investigation, and the department shall have the authority to receive the results of such checks. Fees required for a criminal history record check by the Georgia Crime Information Center or the Federal Bureau of Investigation shall be paid by the applicant or licensee.

Upon receipt of fingerprints, fees, and other required information, the Georgia Crime Information Center shall promptly transmit one set of fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a search of bureau records and an appropriate report and shall retain the other set and promptly conduct a search of its own records and records to which it has access. The Georgia Crime Information Center shall notify the department in writing of any finding or if there are no such findings.

All criminal history record checks received by the department or by the applicant or licensee shall be used by the party requesting such records for the exclusive purpose of carrying out the responsibilities of this article, shall not be a public record, shall be confidential and privileged, and shall not be disclosed to any other person or agency except to any person or agency which otherwise has a legal right to inspect such records. All such records received by the requesting party shall be maintained in conformity with the requirements of the Georgia Crime Information Center and the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

Every applicant and licensee shall be authorized and required to obtain and maintain the results of criminal history record checks on covered employees. Such checks shall be handled by the Georgia Crime Information Center pursuant to Code Section 35-3-34 and the rules and regulations of the Georgia Crime Information Center. Applicants and licensees shall be responsible for any applicable fees charged by the Georgia Crime Information Center. An applicant or licensee may only employ an individual whose criminal history has been checked and has been found to be in compliance with all lawful requirements prior to the initial date of hire. This provision shall not apply to directors, owners, or executive officers of applicants or licensees, whose backgrounds shall have been investigated through the department before taking office, beginning employment, or securing ownership.

Upon request by the department, an applicant or licensee shall take all steps necessary to have an international criminal history record check performed on any directors, owners, executive officers, and covered employees of applicants and licensees. The results of such international criminal history record check shall be provided to the department.

Applicants and licensees shall have the primary responsibility for obtaining criminal history record checks on covered employees. The department shall be entitled to review the files of any applicant or licensee to determine whether the required record checks have been run and whether all covered employees are qualified. The department shall be authorized to discuss the status of covered employee criminal history record checks with applicants and licensees. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article, the department shall retain the right to obtain criminal history record checks on covered employees of applicants and licensees.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-3-42

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective June 30, 2020. See Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter for applicability.

7-3-43.
Suspension or revocation of licenses.

The department may suspend or revoke a license if it finds that any ground exists which would require or warrant the denial of an application for the issuance or renewal of a license.

The department may deny an application or suspend or revoke a license upon a finding that an applicant or a licensee has:

Committed any fraud, engaged in any dishonest activities, or made any misrepresentation;

Violated any provision of this chapter, any rule, regulation, or order issued by the department pursuant to this chapter, or any other law in the course of its business of making installment loans;

Made a false statement or failed to give a true reply in an application;

Demonstrated incompetency or untrustworthiness to act as an installment lender;

Failed to pay within 30 days after it became final a judgment recovered in any court in an action arising out of the licensee’s business of making installment loans;

Purposely withheld, deleted, destroyed, or altered information requested by the department or made misrepresentations to the department;

Operated in an unsafe or unsound manner; or

Failed or refused to remit the fee required by Code Section 7-3-16 within the required time period.

The department shall not issue a license and shall revoke a license if it determines that the applicant or licensee is not financially sound or responsible or not able to engage in the business of making installment loans in an honest, fair, and efficient manner and with the confidence and trust of the community.

The department shall not issue a license and may suspend or revoke a license if an applicant or licensee was subject to, or employs any person subject to, a final cease and desist order or license revocation under this chapter within the preceding five years. Each applicant or licensee shall, before hiring an employee, examine the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry to determine that such employee is not subject to a cease and desist order or license revocation.

The department shall not issue a license and may suspend or revoke a license if it finds that any owner, director, trustee, or executive officer of the applicant or licensee has been in one or more of those roles for a licensee whose application has been denied or revoked or suspended within the preceding five years.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-3-43

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 45/HB 891.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective June 30, 2020. See Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter for applicability.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “fee” for “tax” in paragraph (b)(8).

7-3-44.
Obligation to provide notice; hearings; compliance.

Notice of the department’s intention to enter an order denying an application or suspending or revoking a license shall be sent to the applicant or licensee in writing by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery addressed to the principal business address of such applicant or licensee. If a person refuses to accept service of such notice, the notice shall be served by the department under any other method of lawful service, and the person shall be liable to the department for a sum equal to the actual costs incurred to serve the notice. Such liability shall be paid upon notice and demand by the department and shall be assessed and collected in the same manner as other fees or fines administered by the department.

Within 20 days of the date of the notice issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, the applicant or licensee may request in writing a hearing to contest the order. If no such hearing is requested, the department shall enter a final order stating the grounds for the denial, suspension, or revocation. Such final order shall be effective on the date of issuance, and the department shall promptly mail a copy thereof to the principal business address of such applicant or licensee.

A decision by the department denying an application for licensure or an order of the department suspending or revoking a license shall be subject to review in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” except that judicial review shall be available solely in the superior court of the county of domicile of the department.

The department may pursue any administrative action initiated under this chapter against an applicant or licensee to its conclusion, regardless of whether the applicant or licensee withdraws its application or whether a licensee does not renew or surrenders its license.

The suspension, revocation, or expiration of a license shall not alter, ameliorate, or void the duties, defenses, and liabilities of either a borrower or a licensee under any existing agreement or contract entered into by the licensee prior to such suspension, revocation, or expiration.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-3-44

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective June 30, 2020. See Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter for applicability.

7-3-45.
Cease and desist orders; hearings; reviews.

The department may issue an order requiring a person to cease and desist immediately from unauthorized activities whenever it shall appear to the department that:

Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, a person has violated any law of this state or any rule, regulation, or order of the department. This includes, but is not limited to, a person engaging in any activity that would subject a licensee to suspension or revocation of its license under Code Section 7-3-43, whether or not such person is licensed. Such cease and desist order shall be final 20 days from the date of issuance unless the person to whom it is issued requests a hearing in writing within such 20 day period;

A person without a license is engaging in or has engaged in activities requiring licensure under this chapter. Such cease and desist order shall be final 30 days from the date of issuance without the opportunity for an administrative hearing. If such person obtains a license or submits to the department evidence of licensure or exemption from licensure within the 30 day period, the department shall rescind the order; or

A licensee has received a notice of bond cancellation under Code Section 7-3-21. Such cease and desist order shall be final 20 days from the date of issuance without the opportunity for an administrative hearing. If the required bond is reinstated or replaced and documentation evidencing such is submitted to the department within the 20 day period, the department shall rescind the order. In the event such cease and desist order becomes final, the license shall expire.

Any cease and desist order authorized by this Code section shall be in writing, sent by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, and addressed to the person’s business address or, if the person is an individual, to either the business address or the individual’s personal address. Any cease and desist order sent to the person’s address that is returned to the department as “refused” or “unclaimed” shall be deemed as received and lawfully served.

Any hearing authorized under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

Judicial review of a final decision of the department issued pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” except that judicial review shall be available solely in the superior court of the county of domicile of the department.

Judicial review of a final decision of the department issued pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be in accordance with Code Section 7-1-90, except that judicial review shall be available solely in the superior court of the county of domicile of the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-3-45

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 46/HB 891.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective June 30, 2020. See Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter for applicability.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added the second sentence in paragraph (a)(1).

7-3-46.
Petitioning for state court jurisdiction; civil penalty; other penalties.

Whenever a person fails to comply with the terms of a final order or decision of the department issued pursuant to this chapter, the department may, through the Attorney General, petition any superior court of this state having jurisdiction over one or more defendants for an order directing such person to obey the order of the department within a period of time as shall be fixed by the court. Upon the filing of such petition, the court shall allow a motion to show cause why it should not be granted. After a hearing upon the merits or after failure of such person to appear when ordered, the court shall grant the petition of the department upon a finding that the order of the department was properly issued.

Any person who violates the terms of any final order or decision issued pursuant to this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000.00. Each day the violation continues shall constitute a separate offense. In determining the amount of the penalty, the department shall take into account the appropriateness of the penalty relative to the size of the financial resources of such person, the good faith efforts of such person to comply with the order, the gravity of the violation, the history of previous violations by such person, and such other factors or circumstances that contributed to the violation. The department may reduce any penalty which is subject to imposition or has been imposed pursuant to this Code section. Such penalty shall be final except as to judicial review as provided in Code Section 7-1-90, except that judicial review shall be available solely in the superior court of the county of domicile of the department.

The department may bring an appropriate civil action to enforce any provision of this chapter or any rule, regulation, decision, or order issued pursuant to this chapter, whether by injunction or otherwise, in the superior court of this state having jurisdiction over one or more of the defendants.

The department may prescribe by rule and regulation administrative fines for violations of this chapter or of rules, regulations, decisions, or orders issued pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-3-46

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective June 30, 2020. See Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter for applicability.

7-3-47.
Confidentiality; disclosure limitations.

Except as provided in this Code section, information obtained by the department pursuant to this chapter, which shall include any information disclosed through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, is confidential as provided in Code Section 7-1-70.

In addition to the exceptions set forth in subsection (b) of Code Section 7-1-70, the department is authorized to share information obtained under this chapter with other regulatory or law enforcement authorities. In the case of such sharing, the safeguards to confidentiality already in place within such agencies or authorities shall be deemed adequate. A designated employee or agent of the department may disclose such information as is necessary to conduct a civil or administrative investigation or proceeding related to the business of making installment loans.

The department is authorized to make the following information available to the public on the department’s website, upon receipt by the department of a written request, or in the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry:

The name, business address, telephone number, facsimile number, and unique identifier of a licensee;

The names and titles of the executive officers of a licensee;

The names of the owners of a licensee;

The name, business address, telephone number, and facsimile number of all locations of a licensee;

The terms of or a copy of any bond filed by a licensee;

Information concerning any violation of this chapter or any rule, regulation, or order issued pursuant to this chapter, provided that such information is derived from a final order of the department;

The imposition of an administrative fine or penalty under this chapter; and

The address of a licensee’s registered agent for service of process in this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-3-47

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective June 30, 2020. See Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter for applicability.

7-3-48.
Civil liability limited for providing information.

Except in the case of malice, fraud, or bad faith, no person shall be subject to civil liability arising out of furnishing the department with information required pursuant to this chapter. No civil cause of action of any nature shall arise against such person:

For any information relating to suspected prohibited conduct furnished to or received from law enforcement officials, their agents, or employees or furnished to or received from other regulatory authorities;

For any information furnished to or received from other persons subject to the provisions of this chapter; or

For any information furnished in complaints filed with the department.

Neither the department nor its employees or agents shall be subject to civil liability, and no civil cause of action of any nature shall exist against the department or its employees or agents arising out of the performance of activities or duties pursuant to this chapter or by publication of any report of activities under this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-3-48

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective June 30, 2020. See Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter for applicability.

7-3-49.
Code Section 7-4-4 not repealed.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as repealing Code Section 7-4-4.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 431, § 22; Code 1981, §

7-3-28

; Code 1981, §

7-3-49

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462.

The 2020 amendment,

effective June 30, 2020, redesignated former Code Section 7-3-28 as present Code Section 7-3-49. See Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter for applicability.

7-3-50.
Criminal penalties; void loans; civil penalty to borrower for violation; violation not subject of class action; defense of good faith; limitation on remedies for voidness.

Any person, including the executive officers, directors, trustees, owners, agents, and employees of such person, that willfully engages in the business of making installment loans without a license or an exemption pursuant to Code Section 7-3-4 shall be guilty of a felony and punished as provided in Code Section 7-1-845.

Any person who makes a false statement under oath in an application for a license under this chapter or who engages in the business of making installment loans while the license of such person under this chapter is suspended shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any contract made under this chapter by a person guilty of a felony or misdemeanor under subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section shall be null and void.

Any installment lender who fails to comply with this chapter shall be liable to the borrower or borrowers thereon for a single penalty in an amount equal to twice the amount of all interest and loan fees charged to said borrower or borrowers on the most recent loan made by the lender to said borrower or borrowers; provided, however, that the liability under this subsection shall not be less than $100.00.

A licensee shall have no liability under subsection (d) of this Code section if, within 15 days after discovering an error or violation and prior to the institution of an action under this Code section or the receipt of written notice of the error or violation, the lender notifies the person concerned of the error or violation and makes any necessary adjustments in the appropriate account to ensure that such person will not be required to pay charges in excess of those permitted by this chapter.

A licensee shall not be liable for a violation of this chapter if the licensee shows by a preponderance of the evidence that the violation was not intentional and resulted from a bona fide clerical or typographical error, notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adopted to avoid any such error, and makes any necessary adjustments in the appropriate account to ensure that no borrower will be required to pay charges in excess of those permitted by this chapter.

A claim of violation of this chapter against a licensee may be asserted in an individual action only and may not be the subject of a class action under Code Section 9-11-23 or any other provision of law. A claim of violation of this chapter against an unlicensed lender may be asserted in a class action under Code Section 9-11-23 or any other provision of law.

If a contract is made in good faith in conformity with an interpretation of this chapter by the appellate courts of this state or in a rule or regulation promulgated by the department, no provision in this Code section imposing any penalty shall apply, notwithstanding that, after such contract is made, such rule or regulation is amended, rescinded, or determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.

Any installment lender who shall knowingly and willfully with intent to defraud a borrower make a contract in violation of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and the contract so made shall be null and void.

History.

Ga. L. 1904, p. 79, § 14; Ga. L. 1920, p. 215, §§ 13, 17, 18; Code 1933, §§ 25-217, 25-313, 25-317, 25-9902; Ga. L. 1935, p. 394, § 2; Ga. L. 1955, p. 431, § 20; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1033, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1784, §§ 1, 2; Code 1981, §

7-3-29

; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 7; Ga. L. 2004, p. 60, § 1; Code 1981, §

7-3-50

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462.

The 2020 amendment,

effective June 30, 2020, redesignated former Code Section 7-3-29 as present Code Section 7-3-50, and rewrote this Code section, which read: “(a) Any person who shall make loans under this chapter without first obtaining a license or who shall make a false statement under oath in an application for a license under this chapter or who shall do business while the license of such person under this chapter is suspended or revoked shall be guilty of a misdemeanor; and any contract made under this chapter by such person shall be null and void.

“(b) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any duly licensed lender who fails to comply with this chapter in connection with a loan under this chapter shall be liable to the borrower or borrowers thereon for a single penalty in an amount equal to twice the amount of all interest and loan fees charged said borrower or borrowers on the most recent loan made by the lender to said borrower or borrowers; provided, however, that the liability under this subsection shall not be less than $100.00.

“(c) A lender duly licensed under this chapter has no liability under subsection (b) of this Code section if, within 15 days after discovering an error or violation and prior to the institution of an action under this Code section or the receipt of written notice of the error or violation, the lender notifies the person concerned of the error or violation and makes whatever adjustments in the appropriate account are necessary to ensure that such person will not be required to pay charges in excess of those permitted by this chapter.

“(d) A lender may not be held liable in any action brought under this Code section for a violation of this chapter if the lender shows by a preponderance of the evidence that the violation was not intentional and resulted from a bona fide clerical or typographical error notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adopted to avoid any such error.

“(e) A claim of violation of this chapter against a duly licensed lender may be asserted in an individual action only and may not be the subject of a class action under Code Section 9-11-23 or any other provision of law. A claim of violation of this chapter against an unlicensed lender may be asserted in a class action under Code Section 9-11-23 or any other provision of law.

“(f) If a contract is made in good faith in conformity with an interpretation of this chapter by the appellate courts of this state or in a rule or regulation officially promulgated by the Commissioner after public hearings, no provision in this Code section imposing any penalty shall apply, notwithstanding that, after such contract is made, such rule or regulation is amended, rescinded, or determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.

“(g) Any lender duly licensed under this chapter who shall knowingly and willfully with intent to defraud a borrower make a contract in violation of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and the contract so made shall be null and void.

“(h) No person may, more than one year after April 9, 1980, assert or contend offensively or defensively in any court that a contract predating April 9, 1980, is null and void or is illegal, void, invalid, or not good consideration for a renewal or refinanced contract. This subsection is a statute of repose and limitation, barring such remedies, and only such remedies, as of that date; provided, however, that after that date a borrower or borrowers on a contract predating April 9, 1980, shall be entitled to the appropriate penalty provided under subsections (a) through (g) of this Code section, but such right to said penalty shall not in any way adversely affect the validity of any renewal or refinanced contract.” See Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter for applicability.

Law reviews.

For comment on Georgia Inv. Co. v. Norman,

231 Ga. 821

,

204 S.E.2d 740

(1974), see 26 Mercer L. Rev. 321 (1974).

For article surveying 1976 to 1977 developments in application of the Industrial Loan Act (now Georgia Installment Loan Act), see 29 Mercer L. Rev. 41 (1977).

For article surveying Georgia cases in the area of trial practice and procedure from June 1977 through May 1978, see 30 Mercer L. Rev. 239 (1978).

For article discussing methods of computation of finance charges in Georgia consumer credit contracts, see 30 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (1978).

For article surveying Georgia cases in the area of commercial law from June 1979 through May 1980, see 32 Mercer L. Rev. 11 (1980).

For survey article on commercial law, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 31 (1982).

For article on 2004 amendment of this Code section, see 21 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 59 (2004).

Cross references.

Illegal payday loans, §

16-17-1

et seq.

7-3-51.
Regulatory authority.

Without limiting the power conferred by Chapter 1 of this title, the department may make reasonable rules and regulations, not inconsistent with law, for the interpretation and enforcement of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-3-51

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective June 30, 2020. See Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter for applicability.

7-3-52.
Limited continuation of licenses.

Every license in force and effect under the former provisions of this chapter on June 30, 2020, shall remain in full force and effect on July 1, 2020, and all such existing licensees shall be required to renew their licenses pursuant to Code Sections 7-3-20 and 7-3-22.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-3-52

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective June 30, 2020. See Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter for applicability.